Utah statutes.
16-16-812.   Action without meeting.
(1)  Unless prohibited by the organic rules, any action that may be taken by a
board of directors may be taken without a meeting if each director consents in
a record to the action.
(2)  Consent under Subsection (1) may be withdrawn by a director in a record
at any time before the limited cooperative association receives consent from
all directors.
(3)  A record of consent for any action under Subsection (1) may specify the
effective date or time of the action.
